Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.068

Wine grape industry, instruction relating to—Administration.

Revenues received from RCW 66.08.180 for wine and wine grape research, extension programs related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine industry by Washington State University shall be administered by the College of Agriculture. When formulating or changing plans for programs and research, the College of Agriculture shall confer with representatives of the Washington Wine Society.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 1st ex.s. c 5: See RCW 66.98.100.

Liquor revolving fund—Distribution—Reserve for administration—Disbursement to universities and department of social and health services: RCW 66.08.180.